src/fst/morphology/incoming/Blackfoot_full.lexc
LEXICON VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES
+Der/Nom:0                     NOUN_DER ;
+Der/Nom2:%>n                  NOUN_DER ;
+Der/Nom3:%>i2hsin             NOUN_DER ;
+Der/Nom4:%>hp                 NOUN_DER ;
+Der/Nom5:%>o'p                NOUN_DER ;

LEXICON NOUN_DER
+NA:0 NA_0_IM ;
+NI:0 NI_0_IM ;

LEXICON NA_0_IM
@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@%>im NA_POSS ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@                              NA_POSS ;
@R.person.NULL@                                       NA_POSS ;

LEXICON NI_0_IM
@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@%>im NI_POSS_NUM ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@                              NI_POSS_NUM ;
@R.person.NULL@                                       NI_POSS_NUM ;

LEXICON NA_POSS
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Sg:@U.person.OT@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@:@U.person.NULL@      NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@%>innaan  NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@U.person.KI@%>innoon NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@%>oaawa   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Pl:@U.person.OT@%>oaawa   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES
! Singular
@D.number.PL@ NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ;
! Obviative
@R.person.NULL@+Obv:@R.person.NULL@%>yi # ; ! Optional obviative with non-possessed form
@D.person.NULL@@U.person.OT@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@U.person.OT@%>yi # ; ! Obligatory obviative with 3rd person possessor
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.OT@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.OT@%>yi # ; ! Optional obviative with non-3rd possessor
! Plural
@D.number.SG@@D.person.OT@+Pl:@D.number.SG@@D.person.OT@%>iksi # ; ! Optional plural for non-3rd possessor and non-possessed
! Non-Referring
@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@+Non:@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@%>i # ; ! Optional non-referring suffix, number unrestricted

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.person.OT@@D.number.PL@+Sg:@D.person.OT@@D.number.PL@%>wa # ; ! Optional singular for non-3rd person possessed, non-plural only

LEXICON NI_POSS_NUM
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Sg:@U.person.OT@0   NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@:@U.person.NULL@                NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@%>innaan  NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@U.person.KI@%>innoon NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@%>oaawa  NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Pl:@U.person.OT@%>oaawa   NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES
@D.number.PL@+Sg:@D.number.PL@%>yi # ; 
@D.number.SG@+Pl:@D.number.SG@%>istsi # ;
@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@+Non:@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@%>i # ;


! The following lexicon contains the enclitic pronouns or attached pronouns from Frantz 2017 Chapter 9
! Using the term D3Sg follows Frantz in distinguishing between the 3rd person pronoun used when there
! is only one argument (Distinct third person singular), and just the regular 3rd person pronoun.
! They are not marked as subject or object because they can be either.


! End Code

! I am going to include the concrete verb finals (see Frantz 2017 chapter 18.)
! The reason being that this is the best place to control them considering the four verb classes
! The relfexive changes VTA verbs into VAI verbs and takes VAI suffixes. The same is true of the reciprocal. 
! The benfactive changes Intransitive to Transitive verbs.

LEXICON VAI
@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+VAI:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
!@R.class.NI@+NI+Der/Verb+VAI:@R.class.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VAI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VII
!@R.class.NA@+NA+Der/Verb+VII:@R.class.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+VII:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VII_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTI
@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+VTI:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+NI+Der/Verb+VTI:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTA
@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+VTA:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
!@R.pos.NI@+NI+Der/Verb+VTA:@R.pos.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTA_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VAI_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@0                                           VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI+Der/Caus:@R.pos.VERB@%>áttsi                            VTA ;
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI+Der/Caus2:@R.pos.VERB@%>pi                            VTA ; ! Rare, give low weight
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo  VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o   VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@R.accomp.A@+VAI+Accomp:@R.pos.VERB@@R.accomp.A@%>m	         VAI_SUFFIXES ; ! -> VTA?

LEXICON VII_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VII:@R.pos.VERB@0		VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VTI_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VTI:@R.pos.VERB@0                                           VTI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo  VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o   VTA_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VTA_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@0                        VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo         VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo        VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o          VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rflx+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>ohsi      VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>otsiiyi   VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>tsiiyi    VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! BELOW ARE THE VAI SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VAI_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@+Imp:@R.mode.IMP@ IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Third Person Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa ENCLITICS ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@0   	ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@0   		ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yini   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaana  ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>o'pa	 ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>hpoaawa	 ANIM_INTERR ;  	
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi   	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ; 
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>hsi  	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg:@R.person.OT@%>hsi 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>hsinnaana  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi 	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>hsoaayi	 ENCLITICS ;  
@R.person.OT@+3Pl:@R.person.OT@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON VAI_STEMS
ánistsska'si:ánistsska'si	VAI ;
i'sohkoohsi:i2'sohkoohsi	VAI ;
ihtsiiyi:ihtsiiyi	VAI ;
ikahkainnimaa:i2kahkainnimaa	VAI ;
ikkaaya'yi:i2kkaaya'yi	VAI ;
ikkskssi:i2kkskssi	VAI ;
iksikaaki:i2ksikaaki	VAI ;
iksistohsoyi:i2ksistohsoyi	VAI ;
immaka'pssi:i2mmaka'pssi	VAI ;
inihki:i2nihki	VAI ;
ipááhksstooki:i2pááhksstooki	VAI ;
ipi'ka'pssi:i2pi'ka'pssi	VAI ;
ipisttsi:i2pisttsi	VAI ;
ipottaa:i2pottaa	VAI ;
isínata'pssi:i2sínata'pssi	VAI ;
istta'tsi:i2stta'tsi	VAI ;
isttsisspi:i2sttsisspi	VAI ;
itotoisskskanii:itotoisskskanii	VAI ;
itssoksiisi:itssoksiisi	VAI ;
niitsowá'pssi:niitsowá'pssi	VAI ;
o'tamiaatayayi:o'tamiaatayayi	VAI ;
ohkano'tsisii:ohkano'tsisii	VAI ;
ohpi'si:ohpi'si	VAI ;
okamo'ta'pssi:okamo'ta'pssi	VAI ;
omsspika'pssi:omsspika'pssi	VAI ;
otaimi:otaimi	VAI ;
saipokomsstsimaa:saipokomsstsimaa	VAI ;
sayippoma'pssi:sayippoma'pssi	VAI ;
sopowatsistotoohsi:sopowatsistotoohsi	VAI ;
sspssi:i2sspssi	VAI ;
waahso:waahso	VAI ;
waapitsíkamaa:waapitsíkamaa	VAI ;
wayami'tsim:wayami'tsim	VAI ;
yiniyi'taki:yi2niyi'taki	VAI ;
ikaisínaaki:i2kaisínaaki	VAI ;
ohkotaki:hkotaki	VAI ;
waoo'tokiaaki:waoo'tokiaaki	VAI ;
LEXICON VII_STEMS
aawoyihtsi:aawoyihtsi	VII ;
i'ksskii:i'ksskii	VII ;
i'táámiksistsiko:i2'táámiksistsiko	VII ;
iiso:iiso	VII ;
ikámo'ta'pii:ikámo'ta'pii	VII ;
ikkaniksoohpi'yi:i2kkaniksoohpi'yi	VII ;
iko'ko:i2ko'ko	VII ;
iksikka'pii:iksikka'pii	VII ;
iksistsikoinaattsi:i2ksistsikoinaattsi	VII ;
immi:i2mmi	VII ;
innoyi:i2nnoyi	VII ;
ipahksimo:i2pahksimo	VII ;
ipaksksisskaa:i2paksksisskaa	VII ;
ipiiyinaattsi:i2piiyinaattsi	VII ;
ipoonihkaa:i2poonihkaa	VII ;
isinata'pii:i2sinata'pii	VII ;
isttohki:i2sttohki	VII ;
isttsíkssaakokotaahko:i2sttsíkssaakokotaahko	VII ;
itsimo:itsimo	VII ;
iyoomokihtsi:iyoomokihtsi	VII ;
maansstoyii:maansstoyii	VII ;
miyiko:miyiko	VII ;
niisó:niisó	VII ;
o'kakóyi:o'kakóyi	VII ;
o'miistsi:o'miistsi	VII ;
o'tstsii:o'tstsii	VII ;
ohkowa'pii:ohkowa'pii	VII ;
ohpokohtssi:ohpokohtssi	VII ;
omatapihtsii:omatapihtsii	VII ;
pi'ka'pii:pi'ka'pii	VII ;
sapa'pii:sapa'pii	VII ;
sikkotsi:sikkotsi	VII ;
sskaa:sskaa	VII ;
sstsííwa'si:sstsííwa'si	VII ;
waana'si:waana'si	VII ;
waatsistoihtsii:waatsistoihtsii	VII ;
yissksaana'pii:yi2ssksaana'pii	VII ;
LEXICON VTI_STEMS
i'nohtoo:i'nohtoo	VTI ;
ihkihsi:ihkihsi	VTI ;
iiyika'kimatoo:iiyika'kimatoo	VTI ;
ikawohpattsii:i2kawohpattsii	VTI ;
ikkakoyisstoo:i2kkakoyisstoo	VTI ;
iksikká'pistotsi:iksikká'pistotsi	VTI ;
iksistsikomatoo:i2ksistsikomatoo	VTI ;
inai'tsi:inai'tsi	VTI ;
innoohtoo:innoohtoo	VTI ;
ipáóotskihtsi:i2páóotskihtsi	VTI ;
ipo'tstoo:i2po'tstoo	VTI ;
ippotsipi:i2ppotsipi	VTI ;
issksini:issksini	VTI ;
isttohkohtoo:i2sttohkohtoo	VTI ;
itapomátsskai:itapomátsskai	VTI ;
ma'tsi:ma'tsi	VTI ;
o'tsitsiki'tsi:o'tsitsiki'tsi	VTI ;
ohpattsski:hpattsski	VTI ;
ohtowáatoo:ohtowáatoo	VTI ;
omai'tsi:omai'tsi	VTI ;
onatoo:onatoo	VTI ;
opaksiststoo:opaksiststoo	VTI ;
otamohtoyi'too:otamohtoyi'too	VTI ;
oy'ssatoo:oy'ssatoo	VTI ;
saipskapatoo:saipskapatoo	VTI ;
sápomatoo:sápomatoo	VTI ;
siitohtonni:siitohtonni	VTI ;
sisiksino'tsi:sisiksino'tsi	VTI ;
sopowahtsi'satoo:sopowahtsi'satoo	VTI ;
ssinni:ssinni	VTI ;
sskskomatoo:sskskomatoo	VTI ;
stsiyi'tsi:stsiyi'tsi	VTI ;
waakohsi:waakohsi	VTI ;
waapatsi'tsi:waapatsi'tsi	VTI ;
waawaahsatoo:waawaahsatoo	VTI ;
yáakai'piksi:yáakai'piksi	VTI ;
yisstsiiwakatoo:yisstsiiwakatoo	VTI ;
LEXICON VTA_STEMS
ahkiaapamm:ahkiaapamm	VTA ;
i'powatomo:i2'powatomo	VTA ;
ihtohkihtsi:ihtohkihtsi	VTA ;
iiyikssko:i2iyikssko	VTA ;
ikaisinamo:i2kaisinamo	VTA ;
iki'tsiihtsi:i2ki'tsiihtsi	VTA ;
ikkamssat:i2kkamssat	VTA ;
ikohtoma't:i2kohtoma't	VTA ;
iksimatsimm:i2ksimatsimm	VTA ;
iksisttonit:i2ksisttonit	VTA ;
inaanat:i2naanat	VTA ;
inikkihka'sat:i2nikkihka'sat	VTA ;
insstat:i2nsstat	VTA ;
ipanínnat:i2panínnat	VTA ;
ipisttotskohto:i2pisttotskohto	VTA ;
ippotsipist:i2ppotsipist	VTA ;
istawat:i2stawat	VTA ;
isttsítsskim:i2sttsítsskim	VTA ;
niitsí'to:niitsí'to	VTA ;
ohkoyimm:ohkoyimm	VTA ;
ohsoto'kino:ohsoto'kino	VTA ;
okoowat:okoowat	VTA ;
ommo:ommo	VTA ;
ooyiistoto:i2oyiistoto	VTA ;
otawanss:otawanss	VTA ;
saan:saan	VTA ;
sapohtomo:sapohtomo	VTA ;
síinimm:síinimm	VTA ;
sistsikaaattsi:sistsikaaattsi	VTA ;
ssakimm:ssakimm	VTA ;
ssksimat:ssksimat	VTA ;
sstsáákat:sstsáákat	VTA ;
waahko'sskat:waahko'sskat	VTA ;
waapistoto:waapistoto	VTA ;
wai'pohto:wai'pohto	VTA ;
yiinapssko:yi2inapssko	VTA ;
yookowat:yookowat	VTA ;
